en: Cultivating Tools
xx: Cultivating Tools
cs: Nářadí na obdělávání půdy
da: Kultivatorer
de: Pflanzwerkzeuge
es: Herramientas de cultivo
fr: Petit outillage de jardin
it: Attrezzi per coltivazione
ja: 耕作用具
nl: Ontginningsgereedschap
no: Jordbruksredskaper
pl: Kultywatory
pt: Ferramentas para cultivo
ru: Культиваторы
sv: Odlingsverktyg
tr: Ekme Biçme Aletleri

en: Gardening Forks
xx: Gardening Forks
cs: Rycí vidle
da: Havegrebe
de: Mistgabeln
es: Horcas de jardinería
fr: Fourches
it: Forconi
ja: 園芸用フォーク
nl: Hooivorken
no: Hageklør
pl: Widły ogrodowe
pt: Forquilhas
ru: Вилы
sv: Grepar
tr: Bahçe Tırmıkları

en: Gardening Sickles & Machetes
xx: Gardening Sickles & Machetes
cs: Zahradnické srpy a sekáčky
da: Segl og macheter til havebrug
de: Gartensicheln & Macheten
es: Machetes y hoces de jardinería
fr: Faucilles et machettes de jardinage
it: Falcetti e machete da giardinaggio
ja: ガーデニング用鎌・ナタ
nl: Sikkels en kapmessen
no: Hagesigder og -machetekniver
pl: Sierpy i maczety ogrodnicze
pt: Machetes e foices para jardinagem
ru: Садовые серпы и мачете
sv: Trädgårdsskäror och -knivar
tr: Bahçe Orakları ve Palaları

en: Gardening Trowels
xx: Gardening Trowels
cs: Zahradní lopatky
da: Planteskeer
de: Pflanzkellen
es: Paletas de jardín
fr: Transplantoir
it: Trapiantatoi da giardinaggio
ja: スコップ
nl: Plantenschopjes
no: Planteskjeer
pl: Łopatki ogrodowe
pt: Colher para jardinagem
ru: Огородные лопатки
sv: Planteringsspadar
tr: Küçük Bahçe Çapaları

en: Lawn & Garden Sprayers
xx: Lawn & Garden Sprayers
cs: Postřikovače trávníků a zahrad
da: Plæne og have – sprayflasker
de: Rasen- & Gartenspritzgeräte
es: Pulverizadores de jardín y césped
fr: Pulvérisateurs pour gazon et jardin, Pulvérisateur thermique, Atomiseur thermique à dos, Pulvérisateur thermique\, Atomiseur thermique à dos
it: Spruzzatori da prato e giardino
ja: 庭用散布機
nl: Tuin- en gazonsproeiers
no: Plen- og hagesprøyter
pl: Spryskiwacze ogrodowe
pt: Pulverizadores de gramado e jardim
ru: Газонные и садовые распылители
sv: Sprayflaskor för gräsmattor och trädgårdar
tr: Çimenlik ve Bahçe İlaçlama Pompaları

en: Lawn Rollers
xx: Lawn Rollers
cs: Travní válce
da: Havetromler
de: Rasenwalzen
es: Rodillos para césped
fr: Rouleaux à gazon
it: Rulli per prati
ja: 芝生鎮圧ローラー
nl: Gazonrollers
no: Plenrullere
pl: Walce do trawy
pt: Rolos de jardim
ru: Газонные катки
sv: Vals för gräsmatta
tr: Çim Silindirleri

en: Pruning Saws
xx: Pruning Saws
cs: Prořezávací pily
da: Beskæresave
de: Astsägen
es: Sierras de podar
fr: Scies à élaguer
it: Seghetti da potatura
ja: 剪定のこぎり
nl: Snoeizagen
no: Greinsager
pl: Piły ogrodnicze
pt: Serras de poda
ru: Пилы для обрезки сучьев
sv: Grensågar
tr: Budama Testereleri

en: Pruning Shears
xx: Pruning Shears
cs: Zahradnické nůžky
da: Beskæresakse
de: Baumscheren
es: Tijeras de podar
fr: Sécateurs
it: Forbici per potatura
ja: 剪定ばさみ
nl: Snoeischaren
no: Greinsakser
pl: Sekatory ogrodnicze
pt: Tesouras de poda
ru: Секаторы
sv: Trädgårdssaxar
tr: Budama Makasları

en: Rakes
xx: Rakes
cs: Hrábě
da: Hakker
de: Rechen
es: Rastrillos
fr: Râteaux
it: Rastrelli
ja: レーキ
nl: Harken
no: Raker
pl: Grabie
pt: Ancinhos
ru: Грабли
sv: Krattor
tr: Tırmıklar

en: Shovels & Spades
xx: Shovels & Spades
cs: Lopaty a rýče
da: Skovle og spader
de: Schaufeln & Spaten
es: Palas y picos
fr: Pelles et bêches
it: Pale e vanghe
ja: ショベル
nl: Schoffels en spaden
no: Skuffer og spader
pl: Łopaty i szpadle
pt: Pás
ru: Совки и лопаты
sv: Spadar
tr: Kürekler ve Bahçıvan Belleri

en: Spreaders
xx: Spreaders
cs: Rozmetadla
da: Spredere
de: Streugeräte
es: Esparcidores
fr: Épandeurs
it: Spandiconcime
ja: ガーデンスプレッダー
nl: Strooimachines
no: Spredere
pl: Roztrząsacze
pt: Espátulas para jardim
ru: Разбрасыватели
sv: Spridningsutrustning
tr: Gübre Serpme Makineleri

en: Wheelbarrows
xx: Wheelbarrows
cs: Zahradní kolečka
da: Trillebøre
de: Schubkarren
es: Carretillas
fr: Brouettes
it: Carriole
ja: 手押し車
nl: Kruiwagens
no: Trillebårer
pl: Taczki
pt: Carrinhos de mão
ru: Тачки
sv: Skottkärror
tr: El Arabaları

en: Greenhouses
xx: Greenhouses
cs: Skleníky
da: Drivhuse
de: Gewächshäuser
es: Invernaderos
fr: Serres
it: Serre
ja: 温室
nl: Kassen
no: Drivhus
pl: Szklarnie
pt: Estufas
ru: Теплицы
sv: Växthus
tr: Sera

en: Herbicides
xx: Herbicides
cs: Herbicidy
da: Ukrudtsmidler
de: Herbizide
es: Herbicidas
fr: Herbicides
it: Erbicidi
ja: 除草剤
nl: Onkruidverdelgers
no: Ugressdrepere
pl: Herbicydy
pt: Herbicidas
ru: Гербициды
sv: Ogräsmedel
tr: Zararlı Ot İlaçları

en: Landscape Fabric
xx: Landscape Fabric
cs: Zahradní textilie
da: Ukrudtsduge
de: Unkrautvlies
es: Mallas antihierbas
fr: Géotextiles
it: Tessuti per pacciamatura
ja: 防草シート
nl: Onkruiddoek
no: Hagetekstiler
pl: Agrowłókiny
pt: Tecidos de paisagismo
ru: Геотекстиль
sv: Trädgårdstyg
tr: Suni Çim Halı

en: Landscape Fabric Accessories
xx: Landscape Fabric Accessories
cs: Zahradní textilie – příslušenství
da: Ukrudtsduge – tilbehør
de: Unkrautvlies-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para mallas antihierbas
fr: Accessoires pour toiles de paillage
it: Accessori per teli da pacciamatura
ja: 防草シート関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor onkruiddoek
no: Tilbehør til barkduk
pl: Akcesoria do agrowłókniny
pt: Acessórios para tecido de paisagismo
ru: Принадлежности для геотекстиля
sv: Tillbehör till trädgårdstyg
tr: Suni Çim Halı Aksesuarları

en: Landscape Fabric Staples & Pins
xx: Landscape Fabric Staples & Pins
cs: Svorky a špendlíky na zahradní textilie
da: Ukrudtsduge – fastgørelsespinde
de: Erdanker & -nägel
es: Ganchos y grapas para mallas antihierbas
fr: Agrafes et sardines pour géotextiles
it: Graffe e perni per tessuti per pacciamatura
ja: 防草シート用杭
nl: Pennen voor onkruiddoek
no: Stifter og nåler til hagetekstiler
pl: Zszywki i spinki do agrowłókniny
pt: Grampos e alfinetes para tecido de paisagismo
ru: Скобы и колышки для геотекстиля
sv: Klamrar och nålar till trädgårdstyg
tr: Suni Çim Halı Zımbaları ve Pinleri

en: Landscape Fabric Tape
xx: Landscape Fabric Tape
cs: Pásky na zahradní textilie
da: Ukrudtsduge – tape
de: Garten - Gewebeband
es: Cinta para mallas antihierbas
fr: Adhésif pour géotextiles
it: Nastro per tessuti per pacciamatura
ja: 防草シート用テープ
nl: Tape voor onkruiddoek
no: Teip til hagetekstiler
pl: Taśmy do agrowłókniny
pt: Fita para tecido de paisagismo
ru: Клейкая лента для геотекстиля
sv: Tejp till trädgårdstyg
tr: Suni Çim Halı Bandı

en: Mulch
xx: Mulch
cs: Mulčovače
da: Jorddækningsmateriale
de: Mulch
es: Mantillo
fr: Paillis
it: Pacciame
ja: マルチング材
nl: Tuinstrooisel
no: Kompoststrø
pl: Mulcz
pt: Mulch
ru: Перегной
sv: Komposttäckning
tr: Saman Örtüsü

en: Plant Cages & Supports
xx: Plant Cages & Supports
cs: Ochranné a opěrné sítě pro rostliny
da: Plantesøjler og støttegitre
de: Blumenkäfige & Zubehör
es: Enrejados y soportes para plantas
fr: Supports et structures pour plantes
it: Supporti e gabbie per piante
ja: ベジタブルケージ・支柱
nl: Plantenkooien en -steunen
no: Plantebur og -støtter
pl: Siatki i podpory dla roślin
pt: Cercas e suportes para plantas
ru: Корзины и опоры для растений
sv: Planteringsburar och -stöd
tr: Bitki Kafesleri ve Destekleri